Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-118
Seal; engraved or ink stamp; adopt; use.

All persons, officers, and governmental and nongovernmental bodies and associations heretofore authorized by law to adopt and use a seal on official documents are hereby authorized to adopt and use either an engraved or ink stamp seal for such purposes, unless the use of ink stamp seals for such purposes is specifically prohibited by law.

Laws 1971, LB 653, § 12.

Additional requirements for notary public seal, see section 64-210.